Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.410

Public works projects—Pollinator habitat.

If a public works project includes landscaping, at least 25 percent of the planted area must be pollinator habitat to the extent practicable. For purposes of this section, "pollinator habitat" means an area of land that is or may be developed as habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees. The department of agriculture, in consultation with the conservation commission and the department of fish and wildlife, must develop a list of native forage plants that are pollen-rich or nectar-rich and beneficial for all pollinators, including honey bees.

[ 2021 c 278 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—2021 c 278: See note following RCW 43.23.300.